other.lexd
PATTERNS
Adverb OtherAdd?
Adjective OtherAdd?
Functional
(CompPers) Comp[infl]
Comp[-infl]

LEXICON OtherAdd
<add>:гьи
<add>:и

LEXICON Functional
<conj>:ауаса
<adpos>:апны
<adpos>:пны
<adpos>:гӏалцӏла
<adpos>:пахь
<adpos>:пашвхӏа
<adpos>:ъагӏвабльагӏва
<disj>:момкӏва
<conj>:момызтын
<conj>:ага
<conj>:зны
<conj>:йгьи
<conj>:гьи
<conj>:ма
<pcle>:гьама
<disc>:йгӏауахвырквын

LEXICON CompPers
<1sg>:с
<1sg>:з
<1pl>:хӏ
<2sg><m>:у
<2sg><f>:б
<2sg><f>:п
<2pl>:шв
<2pl>:жв
<3sg><m>:й
<3sg><f>:л
<3sg><n>:на
<3pl>:р
<3pl>:д

LEXICON Comp
<comp>:ацӏкыс[infl]
<comp>:рыцӏа
<comp>:рахӏа
